trunk/resultats/catalan_i.dic
acatxat/BVY
aceració/GVY
acinètic/FVY
adjuració/GVY
adobat/BVY
adoctrinador/FVY
afonització/GVY
agafallós/JVY
agibellat/BVY
agitador/FVY
agustí/HVY
alaestès/JVY
albardà/GVY
aldeà/HVY
alfabet/EFVY
algonquí/HVY
alletat/BVY
alpinització/GVY
alàlic/FVY
ambarí/HVY
amorós/JVY
amplificació/GVY
amunionat/BVY
anacreòntic/FVY
ancià/HVY
anglòman/FVY
anodí/HVY
anticancerós/JVY
antihidròpic/FVY
antioquè/HVY
antocià/GVY
anyer/FVY
apirrossat/BVY
aquell/FVY
aquilí/HVY
aranès/JVY
arbitració/GVY
arnaldià/HVY
arrambat/BVY
arremès/JVY
arrencador/FVY
assassí/HVY
assetjat/BVY
asseveració/GVY
assumpte/EFVY
aurífic/FVY
autinià/HVY
autodifusió/GVY
avalat/BVY
avantatjós/JVY
avorrició/GVY
bacallaner/F
barba-reveixí/H
barbó/G
barquer/F
barrancós/J
bastit/B
beguí/H
beninès/J
bergistà/H
beribèric/F
biatló/G
biscaí/H
biògraf/F
bobinat/B
bocaterrós/J
bohemià/H
boldró/G
bosquí/H
botifler/F
braçolí/G
brianós/J
brunzit/BE
bufó/GH
bulbífer/F
buós/J
cabiró/G
calcític/F
calicí/H
callós/J
canalització/G
caorsí/H
capador/F
capalçat/B
capciós/J
capó/G
carmelità/H
carrosser/F
cartró/G
castellà/H
cautelós/J
cavallejat/B
celestí/G
cellanegre/F
centreafricà/H
cesarià/H
cimè/G
circumveí/H
cirialer/F
cirrós/J
climatització/G
coeditat/B
coetern/F
colombià/H
commutació/G
compendiós/J
comportívol/F
comprimit/BE
conciutadà/H
confí/G
conquès/J
consolidat/B
constrictor/F
contrapressió/G
copernicà/H
cordejat/B
corfós/J
cormofític/F
cotó/G
cranià/H
criptògraf/F
culpós/J
culterà/H
cultivat/B
càmbric/F
declinació/G
delirós/J
demandat/B
depauperació/G
desaparionat/B
descasat/B
descontent/F
desculturació/G
descurós/J
desemborratxat/B
desencativat/B
desenrogallat/B
desgruixat/B
desoperculat/B
desoxidació/G
destriat/B
deumesó/H
dictador/F
digitació/G
disgregatiu/B
dispers/J
divulgació/G
dramàtic/F
edetà/HVY
eguinat/BVY
elevació/GVY
embolcat/BVY
embriològic/FVY
embrollós/JVY
empalomat/BVY
enamoriscat/BVY
enclavillat/BVY
enfervorit/BVY
enganxós/JVY
engruixit/BVY
enllustrador/FVY
enrondat/BVY
entrecalat/BVY
enxonxit/BVY
episcopalià/HVY
erecció/GVY
escabiós/JVY
escaguitxat/BVY
escapçador/FVY
escorregat/BVY
esgalabrós/JVY
esmarrat/BVY
espitllerat/BVY
espió/HVY
esponerós/JVY
esquellí/GVY
esquemàtic/FVY
estipitat/BVY
estugós/JVY
eurioic/FVY
exacció/GVY
exculpat/BVY
exsucció/GVY
fadrí/H
falsiós/J
fasciat/B
femellenc/F
fenificació/G
ferrós/J
filipí/H
flatós/J
fluït/B
fogó/G
foniatre/F
fraudulós/J
fungós/J
fusat/B
futbolí/G
físic/F
galanxó/H
generós/J
germà/GH
gessamí/G
ginjolenc/F
globalitzat/B
gomós/J
gris/IJ
guardià/H
guitarrer/F
habilitació/GVY
hajat/BVY
hidròfug/FVY
hispanoromà/HVY
hongarès/JVY
icosà/GVY
idiopàtic/FVY
implex/JVY
impremtat/BVY
incircumscripció/GY
indecorós/JVY
infiltrat/BVY
infirmació/GY
infrahumà/HVY
infrapsíquic/FVY
insidiós/JVY
intercessió/GY
intitulat/BVY
islamització/GY
israelià/HVY
isònom/FVY
itaquès/JVY
kabardí/H
lamentós/J
leporí/H
lesiu/B
litigació/G
litigiós/J
llanxer/F
lleganyós/J
lletó/H
lluminós/J
locatiu/B
macarró/G
magnífic/F
magribí/H
malaventurós/J
malsucós/J
mandarí/H
mantornat/B
marró/G
marès/IJ
matutí/H
mec/F
merdós/J
meu/BEF
mexicà/H
microfilmat/B
micró/G
moix/IJ
monolític/F
montenegrí/H
morigeració/G
muntanyós/J
murriejat/B
nanser/F
napolità/H
neulós/J
ni/G
nigerià/H
nuós/J
obligador/FVY
obscè/HVY
obsequiat/BVY
oleaginós/JVY
opció/GVY
ortodox/JVY
ortogràfic/FVY
padrí/H
paginat/B
pandiculació/G
paratàctic/F
parençós/J
partiquí/H
pelltrencat/B
percolació/G
peripatètic/F
perlí/H
permès/J
pigardós/J
pinnatilobulat/B
pistó/G
planctònic/F
plorós/J
polissó/H
poncell/F
populeó/G
portentós/J
posticat/B
prescripció/G
pretès/J
primatxó/H
projectat/B
prolífic/F
prostitució/G
pític/F
quotidià/H
racionalitzat/B
ració/G
ramós/J
recautxutat/B
receptador/F
reconciliació/G
reflexiu/B
reimplantació/G
remuguejat/B
reprès/IJ
resignació/G
respost/F
roboració/G
rodejat/B
roí/H
rumiós/J
sacarimètric/F
salvatgí/H
sarrió/G
seixantí/H
semibituminós/J
semoler/F
sibil·lí/H
sigil·lació/G
sobreescalfat/B
sociològic/F
solutrià/H
somicó/G
sospitós/J
superior/EF
superpoblació/G
supí/H
tastanejat/B
telolecític/F
teló/G
tempestós/J
terrassà/H
topògraf/F
torxó/G
toscà/H
tragitós/J
tresorejat/B
trilió/G
troià/H
trompeter/EF
ultratjós/JVY
ursí/HVY
vacil·lació/G
valedor/F
veneçolà/H
verrucós/J
viperí/H
visó/G
vituperat/B
vèdic/F
westfalià/H
xinès/J
òtic/FVY
